Wisconsin, session 2025, SB729.
do enact as follows:SB729,11Section 1. 16.296 of the statutes is created to read:SB729,2,2216.296 Large energy customer fee. (1) In this section: SB729,2,33(a) “Energy utility” has the meaning given in s. 196.374 (1) (e).SB729,2,94(b) “Green innovation fund” means the green bank, known as the green 5innovation fund, administered by the Wisconsin Economic Development 6Corporation in collaboration with the department of administration based on the 7advice of the governor’s Green Ribbon Commission on Clean Energy and 8Environmental Innovation established by executive order 195, issued April 19, 92023.SB729,2,1010(c) “Large energy customer” has the meaning given in s. 196.374 (1) (em).SB729,2,1411(d) “Peak electricity demand forecast” means the amount of electricity 12forecast to be used by a large energy customer at the moment during the 13subsequent 12 months when the large energy customer is forecast to be at its 14highest demand for electricity.SB729,2,1715(2) Each customer of an energy utility that qualifies as a large energy 16customer shall notify the department of that qualification in the manner 17determined by the department.SB729,3,318(3) The department shall collect an annual fee from each large energy 19customer on a schedule prescribed by the department. Upon request, a large 20energy customer shall submit to the department its peak electricity demand 1forecast. For each large energy customer, the department shall base the amount of 2the annual fee under this subsection on the large energy customer’s peak electricity 3demand forecast as follows:SB729,3,54(a) For a peak electricity demand forecast of at least 100 megawatts but less 5than 250 megawatts, $2,000,000.SB729,3,76(b) For a peak electricity demand forecast of at least 250 megawatts but less 7than 500 megawatts, $3,000,000.SB729,3,98(c) For a peak electricity demand forecast that falls within each subsequent 9250-megawatt increment beginning at 500 megawatts, an additional $1,000,000.SB729,3,1210(4) The department shall pay 50 percent of the fees collected under sub. (2) to 11the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation for the purpose of supporting 12the green innovation fund as it existed on January 1, 2025.SB729,213Section 2. 16.957 (2) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:SB729,3,151416.957 (2) (a) 5. The fees received under s. 16.296 (2) and deposited in the 15utility public benefits fund under s. 16.957 (2) (d) 3.SB729,316Section 3. 16.957 (2) (d) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB729,3,181716.957 (2) (d) 3. Deposit all moneys received under sub. (4) (a) or (5) (b) 2. and 1850 percent of all fees received under s. 16.296 (2) in the utility public benefits fund.SB729,419Section 4. 20.505 (1) (gj) of the statutes is created to read:SB729,3,222020.505 (1) (gj) Green innovation fund. Fifty percent of the amounts received 21from fees collected under s. 16.296 (2) for the purpose of paying the Wisconsin 22Economic Development Corporation as provided under s. 16.296 (3).SB729,523Section 5. 25.96 of the statutes is amended to read:SB729,4,42425.96 Utility public benefits fund. There is established a separate 1nonlapsible trust fund designated as the utility public benefits fund, consisting of 2low-income assistance fees received under s. 16.957 (4) (a) and (5) (b) 2., 50 percent 3of all large energy customer fees received under s. 16.296 (2), and all moneys 4received under s. 196.374 (3) (b) 4.SB729,65Section 6. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:SB729,4,6666.0443 Data centers. (1) In this section:SB729,4,77(a) “Data center” has the meaning given in s. 103.08 (1) (a).SB729,4,88(b) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb729 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb729 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB729 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB729 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB729: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting